src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/V-lex-der-cuarvud_gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Verb - čuárvuđ: # MLO, checked

    čuárvuđ+V+Inf: čuárvuđ
    čuárvuđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Inf: čuorvuđ
    čuárvuđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: čuorvuum
    čuárvuđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: čuárvoo
    čuárvuđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: čuárvojeen
    čuárvuđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: čuárvojeh
    čuárvuđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: čuorvuu
    čuárvuđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: čuárvojim
    čuárvuđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: čuorvui
    čuárvuđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: čuárvojii
